Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.050

Approval of court necessary.

A conveyance by a commissioner shall not pass any right until it has been examined and approved by the court, which approval shall be indorsed on the conveyance and recorded with it.

[Code 1881 s 532; 1877 p 112 s 536; 1854 p 205 s 394; RRS s 609.]